District of Columbia statutes.
32-1542.03

Anti-fraud reporting requirement.

The Director of the Department of Employment Services shall file an annual anti-fraud report with the Council by March 1st, which shall contain detailed and comprehensive information about the Department’s anti-fraud activities relating to Workers’ Compensation insurance during the preceding calendar year.

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 43c
as added Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 1102(e), 51 DCR 8441
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1102(e) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1102(e) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).